Kentucky statutes. TITLE XII Conservation and State Development
General Provisions

152.010.
Definitions. [Repealed.]

152.020.
Department for Existing Business and Industry — Divisions — Business Information Clearinghouse. [Repealed, reenacted, and amended.]

152.025.
Office of Business and Technology — Office of Industrial Development. [Repealed, reenacted, and amended.]

152.030.
Agricultural Development Board created — Duties. [Repealed.]

152.040.
Industrial Development Board created — Duties. [Repealed.]

152.045.
Kentucky Recycling Brokerage Authority — Powers — Duties — Brokerage fee — Reports. [Renumbered.]

152.050.
Economic development commission — Membership — Function — Executive director. [Repealed.]

152.052.
Economic development bonds. [Repealed, reenacted, and amended.]

152.055.
Administration and coordination of development programs by Department for Local Government.

The Department for Local Government shall have responsibility for the administration and coordination of Appalachian regional development programs and economic development administration programs.

History.
Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 74, Art. VII, § 6; 1980, ch. 295, § 27, effective July 15, 1980; 1998, ch. 69, § 62, effective July 15, 1998; 2007, ch. 47, § 77, effective June 26, 2007; 2010, ch. 117, § 74, effective July 15, 2010.

152.060.
Duties of department. [Repealed, reenacted, and amended.]

152.070.
Department to prepare and publish maps, surveys, directories, and studies. [Repealed, reenacted, and amended.]

152.075.
Energy resource information. [Repealed, reenacted, and amended.]

152.080.
Department authorization for consultation with governmental agencies, studies and projections, development offices, and promotional advertising. [Repealed, reenacted, and amended.]